hr-HR: Klasa trkaćih automobila: Daytona prototip (DP); Međunarodni Daytona prototip (DPi); Grupa C; IMSA GTP (1980-e – 1990-e); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans prototip (LMP1); Le Mans prototip (LMP2); Le Mans prototip (LMP3); Ostalo
th: คลาสรถแข่ง: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype International (DPi); Group C; IMSA GTP (1980s-1990s); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); อื่นๆ
nl: Raceauto klasse: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype International (DPi); Groep C; IMSA GTP (jaren 80-90); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Overig
tr: Yarış arabası sınıfı: Daytona Prototipi (DP); Uluslararası Daytona Prototipi (DPi); Grup C; IMSA GTP (1980'ler-1990'lar); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototipi (LMP1); Le Mans Prototipi (LMP2); Le Mans Prototipi (LMP3); Diğer
lt-LT: Lenktyninio automobilio klasė: Deitinos prototipas (DP); Daytona Prototype international (DPi); C grupė; IMSA GTP (1980–1990 m.); LMDh; Le Mano hiperautomobilis (LMH); Le Mano prototipas (LMP1); Le Mano prototipas (LMP2); Le Mano prototipas (LMP3); Kita
ja: レースカークラス: デイトナ・プロトタイプ (DP); デイトナ・プロトタイプ・インターナショナル (DPi); グループ C; IMSA GTP (1980年代～1990年代); LMDh; ル・マン・ハイパーカー (LMH); ル・マン・プロトタイプ (LMP1); ル・マン・プロトタイプ (LMP2); ル・マン・プロトタイプ (LMP3); その他
da: Racerbilklasse: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype International (DPi); Gruppe C; IMSA GTP (1980'erne-1990'erne); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Andet
ko: 레이싱카 클래스: 데이토나 프로토타입(DP); 데이토나 프로토타입 인터내셔널(DPi); 그룹 C; IMSA GTP(1980년대~1990년대); LMDh; 르망 하이퍼카(LMH); 르망 프로토타입(LMP1); 르망 프로토타입(LMP2); 르망 프로토타입(LMP3); 기타
zh-TW: 賽車級別: 戴通納原型車 (DP); 國際戴通納原型車 (DPi); C 組; IMSA GTP (1980 年代至 1990 年代); LMDh; 利曼 Hypercar (LMH); 利曼原型車 (LMP1); 利曼原型車 (LMP2); 利曼原型車 (LMP3); 其他
vi: Hạng xe đua: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype international (DPi); Group C; IMSA GTP (Thập niên 1980-1990); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Khác
fi: Kilpa-autoluokka: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype international (DPi); Ryhmä C; IMSA GTP (1980-1990-luku); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Muu
pt-PT: Classe do carro de corrida: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype international (DPi); Grupo C; IMSA GTP (anos 80-90); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Outro
de: Rennwagenklasse: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype International (DPi); Gruppe C; IMSA GTP (1980er-1990er); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Sonstige
el: Κατηγορία αγωνιστικού αυτοκινήτου: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype international (DPi); Group C; IMSA GTP (1980s-1990s); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Άλλο
bg-BG: Клас състезателни автомобили: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype international (DPi); Група C; IMSA GTP (1980 – 1990 г.); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Друго
sl-SI: Razred dirkalnega avtomobila: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype international (DPi); Skupina C; IMSA GTP (1980–1990); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Drugo
it: Classe auto da corsa: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype International (DPi); Gruppo C; IMSA GTP (anni 1980-1990); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Altro
sv: Racerbilsklass: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype International (DPi); Grupp C; IMSA GTP (1980-tal–1990-tal); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Övrigt
ru: Класс гоночного автомобиля: Дайтоновский прототип (DP); Международный дайтоновский прототип (DPi); Группа C; IMSA GTP (1980-е – 1990-е); LMDh; Гиперкар Ле-Мана (LMH); Прототип Ле-Мана (LMP1); Прототип Ле-Мана (LMP2); Прототип Ле-Мана (LMP3); Другое
pt-BR: Carro de corrida classe: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype International (DPi); Grupo C; IMSA GTP (anos 1980 a 1990); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Outro
sk-SK: Trieda pretekárskeho auta: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype International (DPi); Skupina C; IMSA GTP (80. – 90. roky); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Iné
es: Clase de coches de carreras: Prototipo de Daytona (DP); Prototipo internacional de Daytona (DPi); Grupo C; IMSA GTP (años 80 y 90); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Prototipo de Le Mans (LMP1); Prototipo de Le Mans (LMP2); Prototipo de Le Mans (LMP3); Otra
cs: Třída závodních vozů: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype International (DPi); Skupina C; IMSA GTP (80. a 90. léta 20. století); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Jiné
hu: Versenyautó osztálya: Daytona Prototípus (DP); Daytona Nemzetközi Prototípus (DPi); C csoport; IMSA GTP (1980-as, 1990-es évek); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototípus (LMP1); Le Mans Prototípus (LMP2); Le Mans Prototípus (LMP3); Egyéb
zh-CN: 赛车级别: 戴通纳原型车 (DP); 戴通纳国际原型车 (DPi); C 组; IMSA GTP（1980-1990 年代）; LMDh; 勒芒 Hypercar (LMH); 勒芒原型车 (LMP1); 勒芒原型车 (LMP2); 勒芒原型车 (LMP3); 其他
fr: Classe de voiture de course: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype international (DPi); Groupe C; IMSA GTP (années 1980-1990); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Autre
pl: Klasa samochodu wyścigowego: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype International (DPi); Grupa C; IMSA GTP (lata 80.-90.); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Inne
nb: Racerbilklasse: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype international (DPi); Gruppe C; IMSA GTP (1980s-1990s); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Annet
en: Race car class: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype international (DPi); Group C; IMSA GTP (1980s-1990s); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Other
ro-RO: Clasa mașinilor de curse: Daytona Prototype (DP); Daytona Prototype international (DPi); Grupa C; IMSA GTP (anii '80-'90); LMDh; Le Mans Hypercar (LMH); Le Mans Prototype (LMP1); Le Mans Prototype (LMP2); Le Mans Prototype (LMP3); Altele